apertium-kir.kir.twol
"Irregular vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I}"
%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* %{e%}: :Cns :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %-: ] _ ;
             [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns %{e%}: :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %-: ] _ ; 
  where  Vy  in  (  и  ү  и  и  ү  и  и  ү  ү  и  ү  ү )
  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
           matched ;

"Irregular vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"
%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* %{e%}: :Cns :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %-: ] _ ;
             [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns %{e%}: :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %-: ] _ ; 
             except
                                                                  _ %{A%}: ;
  where  Vy  in  (  е  ө  е  е  ө  е  е  ө  ө  е  ө  ө )
  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
           matched ;

"Abstract vowel harmony for {I} after {а}"
%{I%}:ы  <=> [ %{а%}:0 AbstractCns:0* :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: | %-: ] _ ;
         except
                                                                     %>: %{Д%}:т _ р:0 ; ! Avoid conflict with deletion in Causative
                                      %{n%}:н/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: | %-: ] _ ; ! Avoid conflict with accusative deletion

"Abstract vowel harmony for {I} after {э}"
%{I%}:и  <=> [ %{э%}:0 AbstractCns:0* :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: | %-: ] _ ;
         except
                                                                     %>: %{Д%}:т _ р:0 ; ! Avoid conflict with deletion in Causative
                                            %{n%}:н/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: ] _ ; ! Avoid conflict with accusative deletion

"Abstract vowel harmony for {I} after {о} and {у}"
%{I%}:у  <=> [ [ %{о%}:0 | %{у%}:0 ] AbstractCns:0* :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: | %-: ] _ ;
         except
                                                                     %>: %{Д%}:т _ р:0 ; ! Avoid conflict with deletion in Causative
                                            %{n%}:н/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: ] _ ; ! Avoid conflict with accusative deletion

"Abstract vowel harmony for {I} after {ү}"
%{I%}:ү  <=> [ %{ү%}:0 AbstractCns:0* :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: | %-: ] _ ;
         except
                                                                     %>: %{Д%}:т _ р:0 ; ! Avoid conflict with deletion in Causative
                                            %{n%}:н/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: ] _ ; ! Avoid conflict with accusative deletion


"Irregular vowel harmony for archiphoneme {E}"
%{E%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* %{e%}: :Cns :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %-: ] _ ;
             [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns %{e%}: :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %-: ] _ ; 
  where  Vy  in  (  е  ө  е  е  ө  е  е  ө  ө  е  ө  ө )
  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
           matched ;


"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {E}" ! should be just like {A}
%{E%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ :Cns - й ] ]/[ :0 | %>: | %-: ] _ ;
                        except
                                 [ %{e%}: :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %-: ] _ ;     ! Avoid conflict with irregular vowel harmony
  where Vy   in  (  е  ө  е  е  ө  а  а  о  о  а  а  а )
  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
              matched ; 



!!!!!!!!!!!!   й vowel harmony  !!!!!!!!!!

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A} after й"
%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: ] _ ; 
       except
                            й:/[ [ :0 - Abstract: ] | %>: ] _ ( %>: ) [ %{U%}: - :YotVow ] ;
               [ %{e%}: :Cns* ]/[ %>: | й ] _ ;     ! Avoid conflict with irregular vowel harmony
        where Vy  in ( е  ө  е  е  ө  я  я  ё  ё  я  я  я )
        LastVowel in ( и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
               matched ;

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {E} after й" ! should be just like {A}
%{E%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ; 
     except
               [ %{e%}: :Cns* ]/[ %>: | й ] _ ;     ! Avoid conflict with irregular vowel harmony
        where Vy  in ( е  ө  е  е  ө  я  я  ё  ё  я  я  я )
        LastVowel in ( и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
              matched ;

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I} after й"
%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - Abstract: ] ] _ ;
       except
               [ %{e%}: :Cns* ]/[ %>: | й ] _ ;     ! Avoid conflict with irregular vowel harmony
  where  Vy  in  (  и  ү  и  и  ү  ы  ы  ю  ю  ы  ю  ю )
  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
           matched ;

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {U} after й"
%{U%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
        where Vy  in ( ү  ү  ү  ү  ү  ю  ю  ю  ю  ю  ю  ю )
        LastVowel in ( и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
               matched ;

"Deletion of й before yoticised vowels when not earlier in a stem"
й:0 <=> _ (%>:) [ :YotVow ]/[ :0 ] ;



!!!!!!!!!!!  {I}п stuff !!!!!!!!!!!!!

! This is dpulicating normal deletion of {I} after vowels
!"Deletion of all the other {I}s in {I}п forms"
!%{I%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow - м:SurVow ] %>: _ п ;

"Deletion of п at end of verb stem in {I}п forms"
п:0 <=> :LowVow _ %>: %{I%}: п ;

"Shifting of м to where {I} was in <cv_perf>"
%{I%}:м <=> :LowVow м: %>: _ п ;

"{I} to LowVow after LowVow п in <cv_perf>"
%{I%}:Vy <=> :Vx п:0 %>: _ п ;
         where Vx in ( а е э ө о )
               Vy in ( а э э ө о )
               matched;

"{I} to LowVow after LowVow м in <cv_perf>"
м:Vy <=> :Vx _ %>: %{I%}:м п ;
         where Vx in ( а е э ө о )
               Vy in ( а э э ө о )
               matched;

"Make е into э when it's part of a long vowel"
е:э <=> _ [ :э ]/[ [ :0 - %{U%}: ] | %>: ] ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!   {U} stuff (harmony, etc)  !!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {U} after consonant"
%{U%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns ]/[ [ :0 - %{U%}: ] | %>: ] _ ;
!%{U%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns %{U%}:* ]/[ [ :0 - %{U%}: ] | %>: ] _ ;
                            except
                                    й:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;     ! Avoid conflict w y-vowels
  where Vy   in  ( ү  ү  ү  ү  ү  у  у  у  у  у  у  у )
  LastVowel  in  ( и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
               matched ; 


"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {U} after vowel"
!! WAS: %{U%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel ( %>: [ :0 - й:0 ] ) _ ;
%{U%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel (%{U%}:0) ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{U%}: ] ] ] _ ;
         except
             [ й:/[ :0 | %>: ] ] _ ; ! avoid conflict with y-vowels
       [ :Vow - %{A%}: ] ( %>: ) _ %{U%}: ;
         where Vy         in (   ү     ө     о     о     у     у   )
               LastVowel  in (   ү     ө     ё     о     ю     у   )
               matched ; 

"{U} deletion after vowel final stem"
%{U%}:0 <=> [ :Vow - %{A%}: ] ( %>: ) _ %{U%}: ; 
        ! [ - %{A%}: ] so that it applies in e.g. 1-өөсү

"Assimilate {A} archiphoneme before {U} in e.g. negative infinitive"
%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - Abstract: ] ] _ ( %>: ) [ %{U%}: - :YotVow ] ;
               except
                        [ %{e%}:0/:Cns :Cns* ]/%>: _ ;     ! Avoid conflict with irregular vowel harmony
  where  Vy  in  (  ө  ө  ө  ө  ө  о  о  о  о  о  о  о )
  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
           matched;

"Assimilate vowel before {U} in infinitive"
Vx:Vy <=> _ [ %{U%}:0 - :YotVow ]/[ [ :0 - %{U%}: ] | %>: ] ;
       where Vx in (  и     е     э     я     а     ы  )
             Vy in (  ү     ө     ө     ё     о     у  )
             matched;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  MISC !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Passive {l} becomes n after verb stem ending in /l/"
%{l%}:н <=> [ л :SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!  Possessive case stuff !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Deletion of accusative {N} after {n}"
%{N%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;

"Deletion of {n} before genitive {N}s"
%{n%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{N%}: %{I%}: \[ .#. ]  ;

"Deletion of ablative-initial {D} after {n}"
%{D%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ %{A%}: :н ;

"Deletion of dative {G} after px1sg, px2sg"
%{G%}:0 <=> %{I%}: [ %{n%}: | м: | ң: ] %>: _ %{A%}: .#. ;
            %{I%}: [ %{n%}: | м: | ң: ] %>: _ %{A%}: + ;

!!!! Causative stuff !!!!
!! Most of this is to convert {Д}{I}р to т after a vowel (or dental sonorant) stem

"Deletion of {I} after {Д} and before р in causative"
%{I%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow | :р | :л | :н ] %>: %{Д%}:т _ р:0 ;
                 except
                         ! avoid conflict with irregular vowel harmony
                         [ %{e%}: :Cns :Cns* ]/[ %>: | %-: ] _ ;     ! Avoid conflict with irregular vowel harmony

"Deletion of р after {Д}{I} in causative"
р:0 <=> [ :SurVow | :р | :н ] %>: %{Д%}:т %{I%}: _ ;

"{Д} to т in causative after vowel"
%{Д%}:т <=> [ :SurVow | :р | :н ] %>: _ %{I%}: р: ;
        except
            .#. :Cns* :SurVow* :SurVow %>: _ ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!@ а л >:0 {I}:ы {l}:н >:0 {G}:г {A}:а н

!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Reduplication !!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Reduplicated consonant"
%{redC%}:Cy <=> _ [ :Vow :п :Cy ]/[ :0 | %- ]* ;
            where Cy in Cns ;

! TODO: deal with reduplication of yot combinations

"Reduplicated vowel"
%{redV%}:Vx <=> _ [ :Cns* :Vx ]/[ :0 | %- ]* ;
            where Vx in Vow ;

! for Kazakh
!"Reduplicated ambiguous vowel
!%{redV%}:Vx <=> _ :0* :Cx :Vy ;
!            where Cx in ( к г қ ғ к г қ ғ )
!                  Vy in ( и и и и у у у у )
!                  Vx in ( і і ы ы ү ү ұ ұ )
!            matched ;
